Utah statutes.
78B-8-604.   Enforcement.

Any law enforcement officer specified in Section 53-13-103, or ranger, or special agent of the United States Forest Service or the United States Bureau of Land Management may:

(1)  stop any vehicle or means of conveyance, including common carriers, containing timber, forest products, or native vegetation upon any road or highway of this state for the purpose of making an inspection and investigation but may not unduly detain a driver of such vehicle or means of conveyance;

(2)  inspect the timber, forest product, or native vegetation in any vehicle, or other means of conveyance, including common carrier, to determine whether the provisions of this chapter have been complied with;

(3)  seize and hold any timber, forest product, or native vegetation harvested, removed, or transported in violation of this part; and

(4)  sell or dispose of the timber, forest product, or native vegetation as provided by rule by the appropriate agency.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

